Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2502
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of sections 18-2501 to 18-2538, the definitions in sections 18-2503 to 18-2511, unless the context otherwise requires, shall apply.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 1.